Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-621
Dangerous dogs; disposal by court order.

In addition to any other penalty, a court may order the animal control authority to dispose of a dangerous dog in an expeditious and humane manner.

Laws 1989, LB 208, § 5.